Utah statutes.
40-2-103.   Scope and administration of chapter.
(1)  This chapter applies to any coal mine located in the state.
(2)  The commission:
(a)  shall administer this chapter with the assistance of the office; and
(b)  has jurisdiction over a coal mine in this state as set forth in this
chapter.
